Missouri, session 2026, HB3089.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 436, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 436.346, to read as follows:
436.346. 1. As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Conflict of interest":
(a) An employment or other affiliation with, or financial interest in, the
individual, firm, or corporation engaged in the home or residential unit to be inspected
or examined; or
(b) A relationship with a family member or other individual in the home or
residential unit, or inspection that could create an appearance of impropriety;
(2) "Home inspection", an inspection of a residential unit and its attached
carports and garages and the operation of the building's systems by using the controls
normally operated by the owner;
(3) "Home inspection report", a written report prepared for a fee and issued by
a home inspector to document the results of a home inspection;
(4) "Political subdivision", any county, city, town, or village in the state of
Missouri;
(5) "Residential unit", any dwelling from one to four units in design intended
principally for residential purposes by one or more persons;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3089 2
(6) "Third-party home inspector", a person who engages in the business of
performing home inspections for compensation and who in the pursuit of that business
offers to inspect or inspects the condition of a residential unit.
2. A third-party home inspector shall not conduct a home inspection of a
residential unit if the third-party inspector has a conflict of interest, as such term is
defined in subsection 1 of this section.
3. A third-party home inspector shall disclose in his or her home inspection
report the specific building code standards that were used to conduct the home
inspection. The building code standards shall be in compliance with the building code
standards adopted by a political subdivision. A third-party home inspector shall include
a statement in the home inspection report stating either that no deficiencies of the
applicable building code or codes were identified or, if deficiencies were identified, the
report shall list all deficiencies of the applicable building code or codes.
✔